Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201986-1234
Wireless support structure, defined.

Wireless support structure means a structure such as a guyed or self-supporting tower, billboard, building, or other existing or proposed structure designed to support or capable of supporting wireless facilities other than a structure designed solely for the collocation of small wireless facilities. Wireless support structure does not include a utility pole.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 34.
September 1, 2019